North Carolina, session 2025, HB1118.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Housing Finance
Agency the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in recurring funds beginning with
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for the Workforce Housing Loan Program.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1118-v-1*